Connecticut, session 2026, SB00520.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. Special act 24-20 is repealed. (Effective from passage)
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 from passage Repealer section
GOS Joint Favorable
SB520 / File No. 658 1

SB520 File No. 658
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact:
Agency Affected Fund-Effect FY 27 $ FY 28 $
Department of Transportation; TF - See Below See Below None
Resources of the Special
Transportation Fund
Note: TF=Transportation Fund
Municipal Impact:
Municipalities Effect FY 27 $ FY 28 $
Canton See Below See Below None
Explanation
The bill repeals an approved conveyance of a specified parcel of land
from the Department of Transportation to the town of Canton. The
repeal results in the state retaining use of the asset and precludes a
revenue gain up to the fair market value of the property. The town of
Canton would forego gaining use of an asset and paying the fair market
value and administrative costs of the conveyance.
The Out Years
None
SB520 / File No. 658 2

SB520 File No. 658
OLR Bill Analysis
SB 520
AN ACT REPEALING A CONVEYANCE OF A PARCEL OF STATE
LAND TO THE TOWN OF CANTON.